Idaho, session 2025, H0185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2913, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2913. SEARCH AND RESCUE FUND. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the search and rescue fund.
(1) Moneys in the fund shall be maintained in four (4) subaccounts,
identified respectively as the "cost reimbursement subaccount," the "train-
ing subaccount," the "catastrophic search subaccount" and the "equipment
purchase matching subaccount." Moneys in the cost reimbursement subaccount
are perpetually appropriated to and shall be used by the director of the
Idaho state police for the purpose of defraying costs of search and rescue
missions conducted by the county sheriff's office at a maximum of four thou-
sand dollars ($4,000) eight thousand dollars ($8,000) per rescue mission,
regardless of the number of counties or county search and rescue organiza-
tions involved. One hundred percent (100%) of the moneys received pursuant
to sections 49-448 and 63-2412, Idaho Code, shall be deposited to the credit
of the cost reimbursement subaccount. Of the additional fine imposed pur-
suant to section 36-1405, Idaho Code, fifty percent (50%) shall be deposited
to the credit of the cost reimbursement subaccount. In the event the balance
in the cost reimbursement subaccount exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000), the amount in excess shall be transferred to the equipment pur-
chase matching subaccount.
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the moneys received pursuant to the provi-
sions of section 36-1405, Idaho Code, and any amount in excess of twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) in the cost reimbursement subaccount, shall be
deposited in the search and rescue account to the credit of the equipment
purchase matching subaccount, and are perpetually appropriated to the di-
rector of the Idaho state police for the purposes of the subaccount. Moneys
in the equipment purchase matching subaccount shall be used by the director
to match local funds for the purchase of equipment for use by local search and
rescue units, at a maximum amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per unit
in any single year. The cost sharing match in the equipment purchase match-
ing subaccount shall be thirty-five percent (35%) local funds to sixty-five
percent (65%) from the equipment purchase matching subaccount. In the event
the balance in the equipment purchase matching subaccount exceeds fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000), the amount in excess shall be transferred to the
training subaccount.


(3) Excess moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be
deposited to the credit of the training subaccount. In the event the bal-
ance of the training subaccount exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000),
the amount in excess shall be transferred to the catastrophic search subac-
count. Such moneys shall be perpetually appropriated to the director of the
department of law enforcement Idaho state police for the purposes of the sub-
accounts. Moneys in the training subaccount shall be used by the director
for the purpose of providing training funds to sheriffs' offices for search
and rescue training, to a maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per train-
ing exercise, regardless of the number of counties or county search and res-
cue organizations involved.
(4) Moneys in the catastrophic search subaccount shall be used by the
director for the purpose of providing reimbursement to the sheriff's office
for searches and rescues costing in excess of four thousand dollars ($4,000)
eight thousand dollars ($8,000). Claims for reimbursement by sheriffs' of-
fices shall be made on a quarterly basis and reimbursements shall be made by
the director once each quarter. Reimbursement of each claim shall be made by
the director as follows: (a) the first four thousand dollars ($4,000) eight
thousand dollars ($8,000) of a claim shall be reimbursed from the cost reim-
bursement subaccount; (b) the remainder of each claim exceeding four thou-
sand dollars ($4,000) eight thousand dollars ($8,000) shall be reimbursed
from the catastrophic search subaccount. In the event that there are insuf-
ficient moneys in the catastrophic search subaccount to fully reimburse all
catastrophic search claims in a given quarter, the director shall partially
reimburse each claim on a pro rata basis. A sheriff's office may seek further
reimbursement for any unreimbursed portion of a claim in the following quar-
ters.
(5) The state treasurer shall invest all moneys in the search and rescue
fund and the interest and proceeds earned on such investments shall be re-
turned to the search and rescue fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.